Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-169
Bessey Memorial Fund; gifts; bequests; acceptance.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to accept for the Bessey Memorial Fund gifts and bequests of money or property, whether absolutely or subject to reservation of the income thereof either for a stated period, for the life of the donor, or for the life or lives of other persons designated.

Laws 1917, c. 239, § 4, p. 578;

C.S.1922, § 6782;

C.S.1929, § 85-172;

R.S.1943, § 85-169;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 30.